Indiana, session 2026, SB82.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-47-11.1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.175-2022,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. This chapter may not be construed to prevent
any of the following:
(1) A law enforcement agency of a political subdivision from
enacting and enforcing regulations pertaining to firearms,
ammunition, or firearm accessories issued to or used by law
enforcement officers in the course of their official duties.
(2) Subject to IC 34-28-7-2, an employer from regulating or
prohibiting the employees of the employer from carrying firearms
and ammunition in the course of the employee's official duties.
(3) A court or administrative law judge from hearing and
resolving any case or controversy or issuing any opinion or order
on a matter within the jurisdiction of the court or judge.
(4) The enactment or enforcement of generally applicable zoning
or business ordinances that apply to firearms businesses to the
same degree as other similar businesses. However, a provision of
2026 IN 82—LS 6183/DI 144


an ordinance that is designed or enforced to effectively restrict or
prohibit the sale, purchase, transfer, manufacture, or display of
firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories that is otherwise
lawful under the laws of this state is void. A unit (as defined in
IC 36-1-2-23) may not use the unit's planning and zoning powers
under IC 36-7-4 to prohibit the sale of firearms within a
prescribed distance of any other type of commercial property or
of school property or other educational property.
(5) Subject to IC 35-47-16-1, the enactment or enforcement of a
provision prohibiting or restricting the possession of a firearm in
any building that contains the courtroom of a circuit, superior,
city, town, or small claims court. However, if a portion of the
building is occupied by a residential tenant or private business,
any provision restricting or prohibiting the possession of a firearm
does not apply to the portion of the building that is occupied by
the residential tenant or private business, or to common areas of
the building used by a residential tenant or private business.
(6) The enactment or enforcement of a provision prohibiting or
restricting the intentional display of a firearm at a public meeting.
(7) The enactment or enforcement of a provision prohibiting or
restricting the possession of a firearm in a public hospital
corporation that contains a secure correctional health unit that is
staffed by a law enforcement officer twenty-four (24) hours a day.
(8) The imposition of any restriction or condition placed on a
person participating in:
(A) a community corrections program (IC 11-12-1);
(B) a forensic diversion program (IC 11-12-3.7); or
(C) a pretrial diversion program (IC 33-39-1).
(9) The enforcement or prosecution of the offense of criminal
recklessness (IC 35-42-2-2) involving the use of a firearm.
(10) For an event occurring on property leased from a political
subdivision or municipal corporation by the promoter or organizer
of the event:
(A) the establishment, by the promoter or organizer, at the
promoter's or organizer's own discretion, of rules of conduct or
admission upon which attendance at or participation in the
event is conditioned; or
(B) the implementation or enforcement of the rules of conduct
or admission described in clause (A) by a political subdivision
or municipal corporation in connection with the event.
(11) The enactment or enforcement of a provision prohibiting or
restricting the possession of a firearm in a hospital established
2026 IN 82—LS 6183/DI 144


and operated under IC 16-22-2 or IC 16-23.
(12) A unit from using the unit's planning and zoning powers
under IC 36-7-4 to prohibit the sale of firearms within two
hundred (200) feet of a school by a person having a business that
did not sell firearms within two hundred (200) feet of a school
before April 1, 1994.
(13) Subject to IC 35-47-16-1, a unit (as defined in IC 36-1-2-23)
from enacting or enforcing a provision prohibiting or restricting
the possession of a firearm in a building owned or administered
by the unit if:
(A) metal detection devices are located at each public entrance
to the building;
(B) each public entrance to the building is staffed by at least
one (1) law enforcement officer:
(i) who has been adequately trained to conduct inspections
of persons entering the building by use of metal detection
devices and proper physical pat down searches; and
(ii) when the building is open to the public; and
(C) each:
(i) individual who enters the building through the public
entrance when the building is open to the public; and
(ii) bag, package, and other container carried by the
individual;
is inspected by a law enforcement officer described in clause
(B).
However, except as provided in subdivision (5) concerning a
building that contains a courtroom, a unit may not prohibit or
restrict the possession of a handgun under this subdivision in a
building owned or administered by the unit if the person who
possesses the handgun is not otherwise prohibited from carrying
or possessing a handgun.
(14) A county containing a consolidated city from regulating
firearms, ammunition, or firearm accessories in a manner
more restrictive than Indiana law, if the regulation is
recommended by a law enforcement agency that has
jurisdiction in the county. A regulation described by this
subdivision may include:
(A) requiring the safe storage of firearms;
(B) requiring a license to carry a handgun;
(C) expanding background checks for firearm purchases;
(D) prohibiting the purchase of an assault weapon;
(E) raising the minimum age to purchase a firearm to
2026 IN 82—LS 6183/DI 144


twenty-one (21) years of age; or
(F) strengthening laws concerning the seizure and
retention of a firearm from a dangerous person (red flag
laws).
However, a regulation adopted under this subdivision must
comply with the Constitution of the United States and the
Constitution of the State of Indiana.
2026 IN 82—LS 6183/DI 144